Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
[OLD] DETERMINATIONS OF EXCLUSIONS

FROM THE
TOTAL INDEBTEDNESS OF THE

STATE AND
CERTIFICATION THEREOF

§§39-91 to 99 REPEALED. L 1979, c 57,
§9.

PART IV.
STATE DEBT LIMIT STATEMENT AND

THE
DETERMINATION OF TOTAL OUTSTANDING INDEBTEDNESS,

THE
EXCLUSIONS THEREFROM, AND CERTIFICATION THEREOF

§39-91 Definitions. As used in this
part, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings:

"Fiscal year" means the twelve
months' period beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on
June 30 of the next succeeding calendar year.

"Net general fund revenues" means for
any fiscal year the amount of moneys paid into the general fund in the fiscal
year, less the amounts paid therein in the fiscal year (1) received as grants
from the federal government and (2) in reimbursement of the payment therefrom
during such year of the principal of and interest on reimbursable general
obligation bonds of the State that are excluded in determining the power of the
State to issue general obligation bonds for the purposes of section 13 of
Article VII of the Constitution.

As used in this part, the words and terms
"bonds", "general obligation bonds", "net
revenue", "net user tax receipts", "person",
"reimbursable general obligation bonds", "revenue bonds",
"special purpose revenue bonds", and "user tax" shall have
the respective meanings and inclusions given to such words and terms in section
12 of Article VII of the Constitution. [L 1979, c 57, pt of §10]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next